Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3011
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3001 to 77-3014 shall be known and may be cited as the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act.

Laws 1969, c. 635, § 11, p. 2545;

Laws 2019, LB538, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB685, § 18;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 88.